Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Article 4. Medicaid Eligibility

§ 42-2-401.
Definitions.

For purposes of this article:

“Asset”, with respect to an individual, means:

All income and resources of the individual and of the individual’s spouse, including any income or resources to which the individual or his spouse is entitled but does not receive because of action:

By the individual or his spouse;

By a person, including a court or administrative body, with legal authority to act in place of or on behalf of the individual or his spouse; or

By any person, including a court or administrative body, acting at the direction or upon the request of the individual or his spouse.

An annuity purchased by or on behalf of an annuitant who has applied for medical assistance with respect to long-term care services unless the annuity is an annuity as described in 42 U.S.C. 1396p(c)(1)(G)(i) or (ii).

“Income” means “income” as defined under 42 U.S.C. 1396p(h)(2);

“Institutionalized individual” means an individual who is an inpatient in a nursing facility, who is an inpatient in a medical institution and with respect to whom payment is made based on a level of care provided in a nursing facility, or who is receiving home and community-based services;

“Long-term care services” means nursing facility services, a level of care in any institution equivalent to that of nursing facility services, and home and community-based services;

“Resources” means “resources” as defined under 42 U.S.C. 1396p(e)(5);

“Department” means the department of health unless otherwise specified.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 73, § 1; 2007, ch. 104, § 2; 2016 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(i) redesignated the existing paragraphs and added (a)(i)(B).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added (vi).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(ii) substituted “42 U.S.C. 1396p(h)(2)” for “42 U.S.C. 1396p(e)(2).”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed act.

§ 42-2-402.
Transfers of assets affecting eligibility; exceptions; disclosures by applicants.

If an institutionalized individual or the individual’s spouse has disposed of, for less than fair market value, any asset or interest therein within sixty (60) months before or any time after the first date the individual has both applied for medical assistance and been institutionalized, the individual is ineligible for medical assistance for long-term care services for the period of time determined under subsection (b) of this section.

For a transfer within the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the number of months of ineligibility for long-term care services shall be the total, cumulative uncompensated value of all assets transferred within the sixty (60) month period, divided by the average monthly cost to a private patient for nursing facility services on the date of application. The period of ineligibility begins with the later of:

The first day of the first month in which the assets were transferred and which does not occur in any other period of ineligibility;

The date on which the individual is eligible for medical assistance under the state plan and would otherwise be receiving institutional level care, but for the application of the penalty period, and which does not occur during any other period of ineligibility under this section.

In the case of a transfer by the spouse of an individual which results in a period of ineligibility for medical assistance under this section for the individual, the department shall, using a reasonable methodology as specified by the secretary of health and human services, apportion the period of ineligibility for any portion of the period, among the individual and the individual’s spouse if the spouse otherwise becomes eligible for medical assistance under chapter 4 of this title.

An institutionalized individual is not rendered ineligible for long-term care services due to a transfer within the provisions of subsection (a) of this section if the asset transferred was a home and:

Title to the home was transferred to the individual’s:

Spouse;

Child who is under age twenty-one (21);

Blind or disabled child as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1382c;

Sibling who has equity interest in the home and who was residing in the home for a period of at least one (1) year immediately before the date the individual became an institutionalized individual; or

Child who was residing in the home for a period of at least two (2) years immediately before the date the individual became an institutionalized individual, and who provided care to the individual which permitted the individual to reside at home rather than in an institution or facility.

An institutionalized individual is not rendered ineligible for long-term care services due to a transfer within the provisions of subsection (a) of this section if the department determines:

The individual intended to dispose of the asset at fair market value or for other valuable consideration;

The asset was transferred exclusively for a purpose other than to qualify for medical assistance;

That to the extent assets were transferred for less than fair market value, that the assets or their fair market equivalent have been returned to the individual; or

To grant a waiver of the excess resources created by the uncompensated transfer because denial of eligibility would cause undue hardship for the individual, based on criteria established by the secretary of health and human services.

An institutionalized person who has made or whose spouse has made a transfer within the provisions of subsection (a) of this section is not ineligible for long-term care services if the asset was transferred:

To the individual’s spouse or to another individual for the sole benefit of the individual’s spouse;

From the individual’s spouse to another individual for the sole benefit of the individual’s spouse;

To the individual’s child who is blind or disabled, as defined by 42 U.S.C. 1382c, or to a trust established solely for the benefit of the child;

To a trust established solely for the benefit of an individual under sixty-five (65) years of age who is disabled as defined by 42 U.S.C. 1382c(a)(3).

An applicant for long-term care services shall disclose any interest the applicant, or the applicant’s spouse who is not residing in long-term care, has in an annuity or similar financial instrument, regardless of whether the annuity or instrument is irrevocable or is treated as an asset. For purposes of subsection (a) of this section, the purchase of an annuity shall be treated as the disposal of an asset for less than fair market value unless:

The state is named as the remainder beneficiary in the first position for at least the total amount of medical assistance paid on behalf of the annuitant under this article; or

The state is named as the remainder beneficiary in the second position after the spouse or minor or disabled child and is named in the first position if the spouse or a representative of the child disposes of any of the remainder for less than fair market value.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 73, § 1; 2007, ch. 104, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “sixty (60)” for “thirty-six (36)” following “interest therein within” and deleted the last sentence; in (b) substituted “sixty (60)” for “thirty-six (36)” following “assets transferred within the”, deleted “or sixty (60) month period in the case of a trust,” preceding “divided by the average” and inserted “later of:” at the end of the paragraph; added (b)(i) designation and (d)(ii); in (e)(iii) substituted “That to the extent” for “All”, inserted “were” preceding “transferred for less” and inserted “, that the assets or their fair market equivalent”; added (g).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (d)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Attorney fees. —

Review. —

Attorney fees. —

Department of Health for Medicaid erred in denying a nursing home resident’s application for a reduction in her penalty period to account for the return of assets represented by they payment of attorney fees she incurred in her dispute with the Department because the Department’s rules did not preclude the payment of the attorney fees from being treated as a return of assets. Anderson v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2018 WY 135, 430 P.3d 1162,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2018).

Review. —

Revised basis for the decision of the Department of Health for Medicaid to deny a nursing home resident’s application for a reduction in her penalty period was not properly before the supreme court because a post hoc change in its basis was contrary to the resident’s procedural rights and prejudicial to her interests; the Department’s written notice cited only one basis, and because the resident had no notice of its revised basis, she was deprived an opportunity to correct the problem. Anderson v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2018 WY 135, 430 P.3d 1162,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2018).

§ 42-2-403.
Trust transfers affecting eligibility for medical assistance.

For purposes of determining an individual’s eligibility for or the amount of benefits under chapter 4 of this title, the rules specified in subsections (d) and (e) of this section shall apply to a trust established by the individual.

For purposes of this section, a trust shall be considered to have been established if an asset of an individual, other than an asset transferred by will, was used to form all or part of the corpus of the trust by any of the following:

The individual;

The individual’s spouse;

A person including a court or administrative body, with legal authority to act in place of or on behalf of the individual or the individual’s spouse;

A person including a court or administrative body, acting at the direction or upon the request of the individual or the individual’s spouse.

In the case of a trust the corpus of which includes assets of any other person, the provisions of this section shall apply to the portion of the trust attributable to the assets of the individual. This section shall apply without regard to:

The purposes for which a trust is established;

Whether the trustees may exercise any discretion under the trust;

Any restrictions on when or whether distributions may be made from the trust; or

Any restrictions on the use of distributions from the trust.

In the case of a revocable trust:

The corpus of the trust shall be considered resources available to the individual;

Payments from the trust to or for the benefit of the individual shall be considered income of the individual; and

Any other payments from the trust shall be considered assets disposed of by the individual for purposes of W.S.

42-2-402

.

In the case of an irrevocable trust:

If there are any circumstances under which payment from the trust could be made to or for the benefit of the individual, the portion of the corpus or corpus income from which payments to the individual could be made shall be considered resources available to the individual, and payments from that portion of the corpus or income to or for the benefit of the individual shall be considered income of the individual. Payments from that portion of the corpus or income for any other purpose shall be considered a transfer of assets by the individual subject to W.S.

42-2-402

; and

Any portion of the trust or corpus income from which no payment could under any circumstances be made to the individual shall be considered, as of the date of establishment of the trust or, if later, the date on which payment to the individual was foreclosed, to be assets disposed by the individual for purposes of W.S.

42-2-402

. The value of the trust shall be determined for purposes of W.S. 42-2-402 by including the amount of any payments made from such portion of the trust after the date specified in this paragraph.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, this section shall not apply to any of the following trusts:

A trust containing the assets of an individual under age sixty-five (65) who is disabled as defined by 42 U.S.C. 1382c(a)(3) and which is established for the benefit of that individual by a parent, grandparent, legal guardian of the individual or a court if the state will receive all amounts remaining in the trust upon the death of the individual up to an amount equal to the total medical assistance paid on behalf of the individual under chapter 4 of this title;

A trust established for the benefit of an individual if:

The trust is composed only of pension, social security and other income to the individual and accumulated income in the trust; and

The state will receive all amounts remaining in the trust upon the death of the individual up to an amount equal to the total medical assistance paid on behalf of the individual under chapter 4 of this title.

A trust containing the assets of an individual who is disabled as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1382c(a)(3), that meets the following conditions:

The trust is established and managed by a nonprofit association;

A separate account is maintained for each beneficiary of the trust but, for the purposes of investment and management of funds, the trust pools the accounts;

Accounts in the trust are established solely for the benefit of individuals who are disabled as defined by 42 U.S.C. 1382c(a)(3), by the parent, grandparent, legal guardian of the disabled individual, by the disabled individual or by a court; and

To the extent that amounts remaining in the beneficiary’s account upon the death of the beneficiary are not retained by the trust, the trust pays to the state from the remaining amounts in the account an amount equal to the total amount of medical assistance paid on behalf of the beneficiary under chapter 4 of this title.

The department shall establish procedures in accordance with standards specified by the secretary of health and human services under which the department waives the application of this section for an individual if the individual establishes that application would work an undue hardship on the individual as determined on the basis of criteria established by the secretary.

For purposes of this section, “trust” includes any legal instrument or device that is similar to a trust but includes an annuity only to the extent and in the manner as the secretary of health and human resources specifies.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 73, § 1.

§ 42-2-404.
Determination of transfer of asset.

In the case of an asset held by an individual in common with another person in a joint tenancy, tenancy in common or similar arrangement, the asset, or the affected portion of the asset, shall be considered to be transferred by the individual when any action is taken, either by the individual or by any other person, that reduces or eliminates the individual’s ownership or control of the asset.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 73, § 1.

Applicability. —

In a case
in which State filed a lien against two properties to recover the
cost of Medicaid benefits paid on behalf of a decedent, this section
did not support the decedent's sons' argument the properties were
transferred in 2006 before her death because, although the decedent
signed two quitclaim deeds, she did not deliver them; the deeds were
not, therefore, effective to reduce or eliminate the decedent's ownership
or control of the assets. Gheen v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2014 WY 70, 326 P.3d 918,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2014), reh'g denied,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. July 1, 2014).

§ 42-2-405.
Individuals with substantial home equity; disqualification.

An applicant shall not be eligible for long-term care services under this article if the applicant’s equity interest in the applicant’s home exceeds five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00).

Beginning on July 1, 2011 and annually thereafter, the dollar amount in subsection (a) of this section shall be adjusted based on the consumer price index for urban consumers published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the preceding calendar year.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to an individual whose spouse, or child under age twenty-one (21), is lawfully residing in the individual’s home and is blind or disabled as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1382c.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing an applicant from using a reverse mortgage or home equity loan to reduce the applicant’s total equity interest in the applicant’s home.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 104, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 104, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.